Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 21
GENERAL OFFICES

Section

40-21-101. Domestic railroads - headquarters.

Every railroad company chartered by this state shall keep and maintain permanently its general offices within the state of Colorado at the place named in its charter for the location of its general offices; and, if no certain place is named in its charter where its general offices shall be located and maintained, said railroad company shall keep and maintain its general offices at the place within this state where it contracts or agrees for a valuable consideration to locate its general offices; and, if said railroad company has not contracted or agreed for a valuable consideration to maintain its general offices at any certain place within this state, such general offices shall be located and maintained at such place on its line in this state as said railroad company may designate.

Source:

L. 09:

p. 471, § 1.

C.L.

§ 2824.

CSA:

C. 139, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 116-2-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-2-1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 218, § 6, effective March 29.

40-21-102. Officials at general offices.

It is the duty of said railroad company to keep and maintain at the place within this state where its said general offices are located the office of its president or vice-president, secretary, treasurer, local treasurer, auditor, general freight agent, traffic manager, general manager, general superintendent, general passenger and ticket agent, chief engineer, superintendent of motive power and machinery, master mechanic, master of transportation, fuel agent, and general claim agent; and each of its general offices, by whatsoever name known, shall be so kept and maintained at said place. This article shall apply to every person who performs the duties of any of said offices, by whatever title known, and the railroad company shall not be allowed to have any of the offices usually known as general offices at any other place than the place where it is required by this article to keep its general offices. Where the principal shops of any company are situated on its line in the state at a place other than the place where its general offices are located, the superintendent of motive power and machinery and the master mechanic, either or both, may have his office and residence at the place where such principal shops are located. The public utilities commission of the state of Colorado, where it is made to appear that any officer other than the general officers of any railroad company can more conveniently perform his duties by residing at some place on the line in Colorado other than the place where the general offices are situated, by order entered on its record may authorize any such officer so to reside and keep his office at such place.

Source:

L. 09:

p. 472, § 2.

C.L.

§ 2825.

CSA:

C. 139, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 116-2-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-2-2.

40-21-103. Violation of article - penalty.

Each railroad company chartered by this state or owning, operating, or controlling any line of railroad within this state which violates any of the provisions of this article shall forfeit to the state of Colorado the charter or right by which it operates its railroad in this state and be subject to a penalty of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars for each and every day in which it violates any of the provisions of this article, to be recovered by suit in the name of the state of Colorado prosecuted by the district attorney of any judicial district in which any violation occurs to recover the penalty provided in this section for such violation. Any money recovered from any railroad company under the provisions of this article shall be paid into the state treasury and become a part of the available public school fund.

Source:

L. 09:

p. 473, § 3.

C.L.

§ 2826.

CSA:

C. 139, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 116-2-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-2-3.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 218, § 7, effective March 29.